Massachusetts, session 194th, H4060.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 3 the following section:-
Section 3A. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following term shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meaning:
“Free-play recess”, an unstructured environment that is supervised by appropriate school
personnel or staff.
(b) All students in grades kindergarten through 8 attending a public or charter school in
the commonwealth shall, except as otherwise herein provided, receive at least 30 consecutive
minutes of supervised, safe and unstructured free-play recess per school day that shall be held
outdoors whenever the weather and air quality permits. If free-play recess is held indoors due to
of 4

weather or air quality, a public or charter school shall use an appropriate space that promotes
physical activity.
(c) No public or charter school serving students in grades kindergarten through 8 shall
decrease the amount of time it allots and provides to students for free-play recess as a result of
any changes in standards or curriculum that the school is required to or chooses to adopt and
shall not withhold free-play recess for the purposes of providing academic or other services
under an individualized education plan, section 504 or other student support service, including
the completion of ordinary classroom work.
(d) The department shall not exclude free-play recess from structured learning time
requirements for students in grades kindergarten through 8 and shall not increase the total
number of hours required in the school year to meet the provisions of this section.
(e) A public or charter school serving students in grades kindergarten through 8 may
provide less than 30 consecutive minutes of free-play recess on school days with delayed
openings, early dismissals or other schedule changes that result in a school day that is shorter
than a standard day in said public or charter school.
(f) The requirements of this section shall not apply to school days in which there is a field
trip.
SECTION 2. (a) There shall be a special commission established to study and make
recommendations for policies related to student discipline and bullying and their effects on: (i)
educational outcomes; (ii) student, teacher and staff safety; and (iii) physical and mental health.
of 4

(b) The commission shall consist of 15 members consisting of the following: (i) 1
member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives,
whom shall serve as co-chair; (ii) 1 member of the senate appointed by the senate president,
whom shall serve as co-chair; (iii) the chairs of the joint committee on education; (iv) 1 member
appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives; (v) 1 member appointed by the
minority leader of the senate; (vi) the secretary of education or their designee; (vii) the
commissioner of elementary and secondary education or their designee; (viii) 2 members
appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall be an expert on developmental psychology
and the science of learning and 1 of whom shall be an expert on school safety; (ix) 1 member
appointed by the Massachusetts Association of School Superintendents, Inc.; (x) 1 member
appointed by the Massachusetts Association of School Committees, Inc.; (xi) 1 member
appointed by the Massachusetts Teachers Association; (xii) 1 member appointed by the
American Federation of Teachers, Massachusetts; and (xiii) 1 member appointed by the
Massachusetts State PTA.
(c) The commission shall investigate current policies and policy options related to student
discipline in schools, including: (i) their effects on student learning outcomes; (ii) safety for
students, teachers and staff; and (iii) the incidence of bullying among students.
(d) The commission shall make recommendations for policies, including but not limited
to: (i) what policies should be in place for student discipline to promote educational outcomes,
ensure physical and mental health, safety for students, teachers and staff, and prevent bullying
for elementary schools, middle schools and high schools; and (ii) whether such policies should
be promulgated at the: (A) state level and binding on school districts; (B) state level with
of 4

incentives to local and regional districts to adopt them; (C) state level as model policies; or (D)
district level.
(e) The commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the: (i)
commissioner of the department of elementary and secondary education; (ii) chairs of the joint
committee on education; and (iii) clerks of the house of representatives and senate not later than
January 1, 2026.
of 4